California statutes. Civil Code
(f) (1) A plaintiff in a civil proceeding pursuant to subdivision (a), may proceed using a pseudonym, either John Doe, Jane Doe, or Doe, for the true name of the plaintiff and may exclude or redact from all pleadings and documents filed in the action other identifying characteristics of the plaintiff. A plaintiff who proceeds using a pseudonym and excluding or redacting identifying characteristics as provided in this section shall file with the court and serve upon the defendant a confidential information form for this purpose that includes the plaintiff’s name and other identifying characteristics excluded or redacted. The court shall keep the plaintiff’s name and excluded or redacted characteristics confidential.

(2) In cases where a plaintiff proceeds using a pseudonym under this section, the following
 provisions shall apply:

(A) All other parties and their agents and attorneys shall use this pseudonym in all pleadings, discovery documents, and other documents filed or served in the action, and at hearings, trial, and other court proceedings that are open to the public.

(B) (i) Any party filing a pleading, discovery document, or other document in the action shall exclude or redact any identifying characteristics of the plaintiff from the pleading, discovery document, or other document, except for a confidential information form filed pursuant to this subdivision.

(ii) A party excluding or redacting identifying characteristics as provided in this section shall file with the court and serve upon all other
 parties a confidential information form that includes the plaintiff’s name and other identifying characteristics excluded or redacted. The court shall keep the plaintiff’s name and excluded or redacted characteristics confidential.

(C) All court decisions, orders, petitions, discovery documents, and other documents shall be worded so as to protect the name or other identifying characteristics of the plaintiff from public revelation.

(3) The following definitions apply to this subdivision:

(A) “Identifying characteristics” means name or any part thereof, address or any part thereof, city or unincorporated area of residence, age, marital status, relationship to defendant, and race or ethnic background, telephone number,
 email address, social media profiles, online identifiers, contact information, or any other information, including images of the plaintiff, from which the plaintiff’s identity can be discerned.

(B) “Online identifiers” means any personally identifying
 information or signifiers that would tie an individual to a particular electronic service, device, or Internet application, website, or platform account, including, but not limited to, access names, access codes, account names, aliases, avatars, credentials, gamer tags, display names, handles, login names, member names, online identities, pseudonyms, screen names, user accounts, user identifications, usernames, Uniform Resource Locators (URLs), domain names, Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, and media access control (MAC) addresses.

(4) The responsibility for excluding or redacting the name or identifying characteristics of the plaintiff from all documents filed with the court rests solely with the parties and their attorneys. Nothing in this section requires the court to review pleadings or other papers for compliance with
 this provision.

(5) Upon request of the plaintiff, the clerk shall allow access to the court file in an action filed under this section only as follows:

(A) To a party to the action, including a party’s attorney.

(B) To a person by order of the court on a showing of good cause for access.

(C) To any person 60 days after judgment is entered unless the court grants a plaintiff’s motion to seal records pursuant to Chapter 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the California Rules of Court.

(g) In an action pursuant to this section, the plaintiff shall state in the caption of the complaint “ACTION BASED ON CIVIL CODE
 SECTION 1708.85.”

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or negate any rights, obligations, or immunities of an interactive service provider under Section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or preclude a plaintiff from securing or recovering any other available remedy.

(i) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(j) The Judicial Council shall, on or before January 1, 2019, adopt or revise as appropriate rules and forms in order to implement subdivision
 (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   (AB 514)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1708.86.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Authorized representative” means an attorney, talent agent, or personal manager authorized to represent a depicted individual if the depicted individual is represented.

(2) (A) “Consent” means an agreement written in plain language signed knowingly and voluntarily by the depicted individual that includes a general description of the digitized sexually explicit material and the visual or audiovisual work in which it will be incorporated.

(B) A depicted individual may rescind consent by delivering written notice within three business days from the date consent was given to the
 person in whose favor consent was made, unless one of the following requirements is satisfied:

(i) The depicted individual is given at least 72 hours to review the terms of the agreement before signing it.

(ii) The depicted individual’s authorized representative provides written approval of the signed agreement.

(3) “Deepfake pornography service” means an internet website, mobile application, or other service the primary purpose of which is to create digitized sexually explicit material.

(4) “Depicted individual” means an individual who is portrayed in sexually explicit material.

(5) “Despicable conduct” means conduct that is so vile, base, or contemptible that it would be looked down on
 and despised by a reasonable person.

(6) “Digitization” means a process by which any of the following are realistically depicted:

(A) The nude body parts of another human being as the nude body parts of the depicted individual.

(B) Computer-generated nude body parts as the nude body parts of the depicted individual.

(C) The depicted individual engaging in sexual conduct in which the depicted individual did not engage.

(7) “Digitized sexually explicit material” means any portion of a visual or audiovisual work created or substantially altered through digitization, including an image, that shows the depicted individual in the nude or appearing to engage in, or being subjected to, sexual
 conduct.

(8) “Disclose” means to publish, make available, or distribute to the public.

(9) “Individual” means a natural person.

(10) (A) “Malice” means an intent to cause harm to the depicted individual or to engage in despicable conduct with a willful and knowing disregard of the rights of the depicted individual.

 (B) A person acts with knowing disregard within the meaning of this paragraph when the person is aware of the probable harmful consequences of their conduct and deliberately fails to avoid those consequences.

(11) “Nude” means visible genitals, pubic area, anus, or a female’s postpubescent nipple or areola.

(12) “Person” means a natural person or legal entity.

(13) “Plaintiff” includes cross-plaintiff.

(14) “Public prosecutor” means the Attorney General, a city attorney, county counsel, district attorney, or any other city or county prosecutor.

(15) “Sexual conduct” means any of the following:

(A) Masturbation.

(B) Sexual intercourse, including genital, oral, or anal, whether between persons regardless of sex or gender or between humans and animals.

(C) Sexual penetration of the vagina or rectum by, or with, an object.

(D) The transfer of semen by means of sexual conduct from the penis directly onto the depicted individual as a result of ejaculation.

(E) Sadomasochistic abuse involving the depicted individual.

(b) A depicted individual has a cause of action against a person who does any of the following:

(1) Creates and intentionally discloses digitized sexually explicit material portraying the depicted individual, and the person knows, or reasonably should know, that the depicted individual in that material did not consent to its creation or disclosure or was a minor when the material was created.

(2) Intentionally discloses digitized sexually explicit material portraying the depicted individual that the person did not create, and the person knows, or
 reasonably should know, that the depicted individual in that material did not consent to the creation of the digitized sexually explicit material or was a minor when the material was created.

(3) Knowingly facilitates or recklessly aids or abets conduct prohibited by paragraph (1) or (2).

(c) For purposes of this section, both of the following apply:

(1) A person that owns, operates, or controls a deepfake pornography service is engaged in the creation and intentional disclosure of digitized sexually explicit material and shall be presumed to have known that the depicted individual did not consent to the creation or disclosure of the digitized sexually explicit material, unless the person produces evidence of the depicted individual’s express written consent.

(2) A person that provides a service that enables the ongoing operation of a deepfake pornography service shall be presumed to be in violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) if both of the following are true:

(A) (i) A depicted individual or public prosecutor provides the person with evidence sufficient to demonstrate that the person is providing services that enable the ongoing operation of a deepfake pornography service that engages in conduct that violates this section.

(ii) Evidence described in clause (i) shall be submitted through a customer service email or other designated process provided by the person or entity if the customer service email or other designated process is prominently displayed on the person’s or entity’s internet website and shall contain all of the following information:

(I) The name of the deepfake pornography service that the person or entity is providing services to that enable its ongoing operation.

(II) A general description of the services the person or entity is providing that enable the ongoing operation of the deepfake pornography service.

(III) Contact information of the depicted individual or public prosecutor providing the evidence. This information shall be used by the person or entity only to seek additional information regarding the report that is necessary to take the steps required by subparagraph (B).

(B) (i) Subject to clause (ii), the person fails to take all necessary steps to stop providing services that enable the ongoing operation of a deepfake pornography service within 30 days
 of receiving the evidence described in subparagraph (A).

(ii) The 30-day time parameter in clause (i) may be extended by a court if the court finds that additional time is needed to conduct an ongoing law enforcement investigation or operation.

(d) (1) A person is not liable under this section in either of the following circumstances:

(A) The person discloses the digitized sexually explicit material in the course of any of the following:

(i) Reporting unlawful activity.

(ii) Exercising the person’s law enforcement duties.

(iii) Hearings, trials, or other legal proceedings.

(B) The material is any of the following:

(i) A matter of legitimate public concern.

(ii) A work of political or newsworthy value or similar work.

(iii) Commentary, criticism, or disclosure that is otherwise protected by the California Constitution or the United States Constitution.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, digitized sexually explicit material is not of newsworthy value solely because the depicted individual is a public figure.

(e) (1) It shall not be a defense to an action under this section that there is a disclaimer included in the digitized sexually explicit material that communicates that
 the depicted individual did not participate in or authorize the creation or development of the material.

(2) It shall not be a defense to an action under this section that a deepfake pornography service has a disclaimer or statement that states that users are prohibited from generating digitized sexually explicit material of a depicted individual without the individual’s consent.

(f) (1) A prevailing plaintiff who is a depicted individual who suffers harm as a result of a violation of this section may recover any of the following:

(A) An amount equal to the monetary gain made by the defendant from the creation and disclosure of the digitized sexually explicit material.

(B) One of the following:

(i) Economic and noneconomic damages proximately caused by the disclosure of the digitized sexually explicit material, including damages for emotional distress.

(ii) Upon request of the plaintiff at any time before the final judgment is rendered, the plaintiff may instead recover an award of statutory damages for all unauthorized acts involved in the action, with respect to any one work, as follows:

(I) A sum of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) but not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(II) If the unlawful act was committed with malice, the award of statutory damages may be increased to a maximum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(C) Punitive
 damages.

(D) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(E) Any other available relief, including injunctive relief.

(2) A public prosecutor may bring a civil action to enforce this section.

(A) In an action brought under this paragraph, the public prosecutor shall not be required to prove that a depicted individual suffered actual harm.

(B) A prevailing public prosecutor under this paragraph is entitled to all of the following:

(i) Injunctive and other equitable relief.

(ii) A civil penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation.

(iii) For a violation committed with malice, a civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation.

(iv) Reasonable attorney’s fees.

(v) Any other relief the court deems appropriate.

(3) The remedies provided by this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting a remedy that is available under any other law.

(g) An action under this section shall be commenced no later than three years from the date the unauthorized creation, development, or disclosure was discovered or should have been discovered with the exercise of reasonable diligence.

(h) The provisions of this section are severable. If any
 provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions.

(i) This section does not apply to conduct that is protected by federal law, including Section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(j) (1) This section shall not be construed to require an internet service provider to engage in any activity that would violate Title 15 (commencing with Section 3100) of Part 4 of Division 3. An internet service provider shall not be held liable under this section for the mere transmission, routing, or provision of access to third-party content over its network.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “internet service provider” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 3100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 673, Sec. 1.   (AB 621)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1708.88.

(a) A private cause of action lies against a person 18 years of age or older who knowingly sends an image, that the person knows or reasonably should know is unsolicited, by electronic means, depicting obscene material.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) An “image” includes, but is not limited to, a moving visual image.

(2) “Obscene material” means material, including, but not limited to, images
 depicting a person engaging in an act of sexual intercourse, sodomy, oral copulation, sexual penetration, or masturbation, or depicting the exposed genitals or anus of any person, taken as a whole, that to the average person, applying contemporary statewide standards, appeals to the prurient interest, that, taken as a whole, depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way, and that, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value.

(3) An image is “unsolicited” if the recipient has not consented to or has expressly forbidden the receipt of the image.

(c) (1) A prevailing plaintiff who suffers harm as a result of receiving an image in violation of subdivision (a) may recover economic and noneconomic damages
 proximately caused by the receipt of the image, including damages for emotional distress.

(2) A prevailing plaintiff who suffers harm as a result of receiving an image, the receipt of which had been expressly forbidden by the plaintiff, in violation of subdivision (a), may recover the following:

(A) Economic and noneconomic damages proximately caused by the receipt of the image, including damages for emotional distress.

(B) Upon request of the plaintiff at any time before the final judgment is rendered, the plaintiff may, in lieu of those damages specified in subparagraph (A), recover an award of statutory damages of a sum of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) but not more than thirty thousand
 dollars ($30,000).

(C) Punitive damages.

(3) A prevailing plaintiff described in paragraph (1) or (2) may recover the following: 

(A) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(B) Any other available relief, including injunctive relief.

(4) The remedies provided by this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting a remedy that is available under any other law.

(d) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An internet service provider, mobile
 data provider, or operator of an online or mobile application, to the extent that the entity is transmitting, routing, or providing connections for electronic communications initiated by or at the direction of another person.

(2) Any service that transmits images or audiovisual works, including, without limitation, an on-demand, subscription, or advertising-supported service.

(3) A health care provider transmitting an image for a legitimate medical purpose.

(4) An individual who has not expressly opted-out of receiving sexually explicit images on the service in which the image is transmitted, where such an option is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 504, Sec. 1.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1708.89.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms apply:

(1) “Doxes” means an act when a person, with intent to place another person in reasonable fear for their safety, or the safety of the other person’s immediate family, by means of an electronic communication device, and without consent of the other person, and for the purpose of imminently causing that other person unwanted physical contact, injury, or harassment, by a third party, electronically distributes, publishes, emails, hyperlinks, or makes available for downloading, personal identifying information, including, but not limited to, a digital image of another person, or an electronic message of a
 harassing nature about another person, which would be likely to incite or produce that unlawful action.

(2) “Electronic communication” has the same meaning as the term is defined in paragraph (12) of Section 2510 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(3) “Electronic communication device” includes, but is not limited to, telephones, cell phones, computers, internet web pages or websites, internet phones, hybrid cellular/wireless devices, personal digital assistants, video recorders, fax machines, or pagers.

(4) “Harassment” means a knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person that a reasonable person would consider as seriously alarming, seriously annoying, seriously tormenting, or seriously terrorizing
 the person and that serves no legitimate purpose.

(5) “Identifying characteristics” means name or any part thereof, address or any part thereof, city or unincorporated area of residence, age, marital status, relationship to defendant, and race or ethnic background, telephone number, email address, social media profiles, online identifiers, contact information, or any other information, including images of the plaintiff, from which the plaintiff’s identity can be discerned.

(6) “Of a harassing nature” means of a nature that a reasonable person would consider as seriously alarming, seriously annoying, seriously tormenting, or seriously terrorizing of the person and that serves no legitimate purpose.

(7) “Online
 identifiers” means any personally identifying information or signifiers that would tie an individual to a particular electronic service, device, or internet application, website, or platform account, including, but not limited to, access names, access codes, account names, aliases, avatars, credentials, gamer tags, display names, handles, login names, member names, online identities, pseudonyms, screen names, user accounts, user identifications, usernames, Uniform Resource Locators (URLs), domain names, Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, and media access control (MAC) addresses.

(b) A private cause of action lies against a person who doxes another person.

(c) A prevailing plaintiff who suffers harm as a result of being doxed in violation of subdivision (b) may recover any of
 the following:

(1) Economic and noneconomic damages proximately caused by being doxed, including, but not limited to, damages for physical harm, emotional distress, or property damage.

(2) Statutory damages of a sum of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) but not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(3) Punitive damages.

(4) Upon the court holding a properly noticed hearing, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing plaintiff.

(d) In addition to any other relief available at law, the court may order equitable relief against the person violating
 subdivision (b), including a temporary restraining order, or a preliminary injunction or a permanent injunction ordering the defendant to cease doxing activities. The court may grant injunctive relief maintaining the confidentiality of a plaintiff using a pseudonym as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) A plaintiff in a civil proceeding pursuant to subdivision (b) may proceed using a pseudonym, either John Doe, Jane Doe, or Doe, for the true name of the plaintiff and may exclude or redact from all pleadings and documents filed in the action other identifying characteristics of the plaintiff. A plaintiff who proceeds using a pseudonym and excluding or redacting identifying characteristics as provided in this section shall file with the court and serve upon the defendant a confidential information form for this
 purpose that includes the plaintiff’s name and other identifying characteristics excluded or redacted. The court shall keep the plaintiff’s name and excluded or redacted characteristics confidential.

(2) In cases where a plaintiff proceeds using a pseudonym under this section, the following applies:

(A) All other parties and their agents and attorneys shall use this pseudonym in all pleadings, discovery documents, and other documents filed or served in the action, and at hearings, trial, and other court proceedings that are open to the public.

(B) (i) Any party filing a pleading, discovery document, or other document in the action shall exclude or redact any identifying characteristics of the
 plaintiff from the pleading, discovery document, or other document, except for a confidential information form filed pursuant to this subdivision.

(ii) A party excluding or redacting identifying characteristics as provided in this section shall file with the court and serve upon all other parties a confidential information form that includes the plaintiff’s name and other identifying characteristics excluded or redacted. The court shall keep the plaintiff’s name and excluded or redacted characteristics confidential.

(C) All court decisions, orders, petitions, discovery documents, and other documents shall be worded so as to protect the name or other identifying characteristics of the plaintiff from public revelation.

(3) The responsibility for excluding or redacting the name or identifying characteristics of the plaintiff from all documents filed with the court shall be the responsibility of the parties and their attorneys. This section does not require the court to review pleadings or other papers for compliance with this subdivision.

(4) Upon request of the plaintiff, the court shall limit access to the court records in an action filed under this section to the following individuals:

(A) A party to the action, including a party’s attorney.

(B) A person by order of the court on a showing of good cause for access.

(C) A person 60 days after judgment is entered unless
 the court grants a plaintiff’s motion to seal records pursuant to Chapter 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the California Rules of Court.

(f) In an action pursuant to this section, the plaintiff shall state in the caption of the complaint “ACTION BASED ON CIVIL CODE SECTION 1708.89.”

(g) This section does not alter or negate any rights, obligations, or immunities of an interactive service provider under Section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code. This section does not limit or preclude a plaintiff from securing or recovering any other available remedy.

(h) On
 or before January 1, 2026, the Judicial Council shall adopt or revise as appropriate rules and forms to implement subdivision (e).

(i) This section shall not apply against a person who solely does either of the following:

(1) Provide a person’s personal identifying information or sensitive personal information in connection with the reporting of criminal activity to an employee of a law enforcement agency or with any lawfully authorized investigative, protective, or intelligence activity of any law enforcement agency or of an intelligence agency of the United States and the person making the report reasonably believes it is true.

(2) Disseminate the personally identifiable information for the purpose
 of, or in connection with, the reporting of conduct reasonably believed to be unlawful.

(j) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 557, Sec. 2.   (AB 1979)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1708.9.

(a) It is unlawful for any person, except a parent or guardian acting toward his or her minor child, to commit any of the following acts:

(1) By force, threat of force, or physical obstruction that is a crime of violence, to intentionally injure, intimidate, interfere with, or attempt to injure, intimidate, or interfere with, any person attempting to enter or exit a facility.

(2) By nonviolent physical obstruction, to intentionally injure, intimidate, interfere with, or attempt to injure, intimidate, or interfere with, any person attempting to enter or exit a facility.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Facility” means any public or private school grounds, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 626.8 of the Penal Code, or any health facility, as described in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) To “interfere” means to restrict a person’s freedom of movement.

(3) To “intimidate” means to place a person in reasonable apprehension of bodily harm to himself, herself, or another person.

(4) “Nonviolent” means conduct that would not constitute a crime of violence.

(5) “Physical obstruction” means rendering ingress to or egress from a facility impassable to another person, or rendering passage to or from a facility unreasonably difficult or hazardous to another person.

(c) A person aggrieved by a violation of subdivision (a) may bring a civil action to enjoin the violation, for compensatory and punitive damages, for injunctive relief, and for the cost of suit and reasonable attorney’s and expert witness’ fees. With respect to compensatory damages, the plaintiff may elect, at any time prior to the rendering of a final judgment, to recover, in lieu of actual damages, an award of statutory damages in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation of paragraph
 (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) The Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney may bring a civil action to enjoin a violation of subdivision (a), for compensatory damages to persons or entities aggrieved by the violation, and for the imposition of a civil penalty against each respondent. The civil penalty for a violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a second or subsequent violation. The civil penalty for a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a second or subsequent violation.

(e) This section shall not be construed to impair the right to engage in any constitutionally protected activity, including, but not limited to, speech, protest, or assembly.

(f) The adoption of the act that added this section is an exercise of the police power of the state for purposes of protecting the health, safety, and welfare of the people of California, and this section shall be liberally construed to effectuate that purpose.

(g) This section shall not be construed to restrict, inhibit, prevent, or bring a chilling effect upon any actions by a person that are reasonable under the circumstances to protect, secure, provide safety to, or prevent illness in any child or adult in a facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 852, Sec. 2.   (AB 1256)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1709.

One who willfully deceives another with intent to induce him to alter his position to his injury or risk, is liable for any damage which he thereby suffers.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1710.

A deceit, within the meaning of the last section, is either:

1. The suggestion, as a fact, of that which is not true, by one who does not believe it to be true;

2. The assertion, as a fact, of that which is not true, by one who has no reasonable ground for believing it to be true;

3. The suppression of a fact, by one who is bound to disclose it, or who gives information of other facts which are likely to mislead for want of communication of that fact; or,

4. A promise, made without any intention of performing it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1710.1.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, sells or disposes of a radio, piano, phonograph, sewing machine, washing machine, typewriter, adding machine, comptometer, bicycle, firearm, safe, vacuum cleaner, dictaphone, watch, watch movement, watchcase, or any other mechanical or electrical device, appliance, contrivance, material, piece of apparatus or equipment, from which the manufacturer’s nameplate, serial number or any other distinguishing number or identification mark has been removed, defaced, covered, altered or destroyed, is civilly liable to the manufacturer in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) per transaction and civilly liable to the purchaser for treble the
 actual damages sustained by the purchaser.

This section does not apply to those cases or instances where any of the changes or alterations enumerated in this section have been customarily made or done as an established practice in the ordinary and regular conduct of business by the original manufacturer or his duly appointed direct representative or under specific authorization from the original manufacturer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1713.)
-------------------------------------------

1710.2.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (d), an owner of real property or his or her agent, or any agent of a transferee of real property, is not required to disclose either of the following to the transferee, as these are not material facts that require disclosure:

(A) The occurrence of an occupant’s death upon the real
 property or the manner of death where the death has occurred more than three years prior to the date the transferee offers to purchase, lease, or rent the real property.

(B) That an occupant of that property was living with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or died from AIDS-related complications.

(2) As used in this section:

(A) “Agent” includes any person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) “Transferee” includes a purchaser, lessee, or renter of real property.

(3) No cause of action shall arise against an owner or his or her agent or any agent of a transferee for not disclosing facts pursuant to paragraph
 (1).

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to occupy the field of regulation of disclosure related to either of the following:

(1) Deaths occurring upon real property.

(2) The HIV-positive status of a prior occupant in situations affecting the transfer of real property or any estate or interest in real property.

(c) This section shall not be construed to alter the law relating to disclosure pertaining to any other physical or mental condition or disease, and this section shall not relieve any owner or agent of any obligation to disclose the physical condition of the premises.

(d) This section shall not be construed to immunize an owner or his or her agent from making an intentional
 misrepresentation in response to a direct inquiry from a transferee or a prospective transferee of real property, concerning deaths on the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 548, Sec. 1.   (AB 73)   Effective September 24, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1711.

One who practices a deceit with intent to defraud the public, or a particular class of persons, is deemed to have intended to defraud every individual in that class, who is actually misled by the deceit.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1712.

One who obtains a thing without the consent of its owner, or by a consent afterwards rescinded, or by an unlawful exaction which the owner could not at the time prudently refuse, must restore it to the person from whom it was thus obtained, unless he has acquired a title thereto superior to that of such other person, or unless the transaction was corrupt and unlawful on both sides.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1713.

The restoration required by the last section must be made without demand, except where a thing is obtained by mutual mistake, in which case the party obtaining the thing is not bound to return it until he has notice of the mistake.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.

(a) Everyone is responsible, not only for the result of his or her willful acts, but also for an injury occasioned to another by his or her want of ordinary care or skill in the management of his or her property or person, except so far as the latter has, willfully or by want of ordinary care, brought the injury upon himself or herself. The design, distribution, or marketing of firearms and ammunition is
 not exempt from the duty to use ordinary care and skill that is required by this section. The extent of liability in these cases is defined by the Title on Compensatory Relief.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to abrogate the holdings in cases such as Vesely v. Sager (1971) 5 Cal.3d 153, Bernhard v. Harrah’s Club (1976) 16 Cal.3d 313, and Coulter v. Superior Court (1978) 21 Cal.3d 144 and to reinstate the prior judicial interpretation of this section as it relates to proximate cause for injuries incurred as a result of furnishing alcoholic beverages to an intoxicated person, namely that the furnishing of alcoholic beverages is not the proximate cause of injuries resulting from intoxication, but rather the consumption of alcoholic beverages is the proximate cause of injuries inflicted upon another by an intoxicated person.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), no social
 host who furnishes alcoholic beverages to any person may be held legally accountable for damages suffered by that person, or for injury to the person or property of, or death of, any third person, resulting from the consumption of those beverages.

(d) (1) Nothing in subdivision (c) shall preclude a claim against a parent, guardian, or another adult who knowingly furnishes alcoholic beverages at his or her residence to a person whom he or she knows, or should have known, to be under 21 years of age, in which case, notwithstanding subdivision (b), the furnishing of the alcoholic beverage may be found to be the proximate cause of resulting injuries or death.

(2) A claim under this subdivision may be brought by, or on behalf of, the person under 21 years of age or by a person who was harmed by the person under 21 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   (AB 1407)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.01.

(a) Domestic partners shall be entitled to recover damages for negligent infliction of emotional distress to the same extent that spouses are entitled to do so under California law.

(b) For the purpose of this section, “domestic partners” has the meaning provided in Section 297 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.1.

(a) Any act of willful misconduct of a minor that results in injury or death to another person or in any injury to the property of another shall be imputed to the parent or guardian having custody and control of the minor for all purposes of civil damages, and the parent or guardian having custody and control shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for any damages resulting from the willful misconduct.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision (c), the joint and several liability of the
 parent or guardian having custody and control of a minor under this subdivision shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each tort of the minor, and in the case of injury to a person, imputed liability shall be further limited to medical, dental and hospital expenses incurred by the injured person, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The liability imposed by this section is in addition to any liability now imposed by law.
